Montana, session 2025, LC2366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-6-143, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-143. Class ten property -- description -- taxable percentage. (1) Class ten property includes
all forest lands, as defined in 15-44-102, and property described in subsection (2).
(2) Any parcel of growing timber totaling less than 15 acres qualifies as class ten property if, in a
prior year, the parcel totaled 15 acres or more and qualified as forest land but the number of acres was reduced
to less than 15 acres for a public use described in 70-30-102 by the federal government, the state, a county, or
a municipality and, since that reduction in acres, the parcel has not been further divided.
(3) Class ten property is taxed at:
(a) 0.29% of its forest productivity value in tax year 2023;
(b) 0.27% of its forest productivity value in tax year 2024; and
(c) 0.37% 2.37% of its forest productivity value in tax years after 2024."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to property tax years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****